Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.710

Designation of inspection points and terminal warehouses.

The department may designate a warehouse located at an inspection point as a terminal warehouse. The department shall, by rule, designate inspection points which shall be provided with state/federal inspection and weighing services commencing July 1, 1979. The revenue from inspection and weighing shall equal the cost of providing such services. Where the department after hearing determines that such cities are no longer necessary as inspection points it may by rule change such designated inspection points by removing one or more locations.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 21; 1963 c 124 s 38. Formerly RCW 22.09.380.]